Hawaii, session 2025, HB268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that twenty-five states have passed laws restricting male students' ability to compete in female sports.  Title IX was a legislative landmark that sought to provide opportunities for women in education and athletics.  Allowing biological males to compete in female sports reverses the hard-fought progress that led to the implementation of Title IX. The purpose of this act is to protect the rights of females to compete in interscholastic sports by requiring that athletic teams be designated by biological sex assigned at birth. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Sex-based athletic competitions.  (a)  The department shall require that all schools competing in interscholastic sports designate separate athletic teams based on biological sex.  Athletic teams shall be designated as one of the following based on biological sex assigned at birth: (1)  Male; (2)  Female; or (3)  Coed. (b) Athletic teams designated for females shall not be open to participation by males." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________